Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.488

[Art. 57] Effective date of sentences.

(1) No forfeiture may extend to any pay or allowances accrued before the date on which the sentence is approved by the person acting under RCW 38.38.536.

(2) Any period of confinement included in a sentence of a court-martial begins to run from the date the sentence is ordered to be executed by the convening authority, but periods during which the sentence to confinement is suspended or deferred shall be excluded in computing the service of the term of confinement. Regulations prescribed by the governor may provide that sentences of confinement may not be executed until approved by designated officers.

(3) All other sentences of courts-martial are effective on the date ordered executed.

(4) On application by an accused who is under sentence to confinement that has not been ordered executed, the convening authority or, if the accused is no longer under his or her jurisdiction, the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned, may, in his or her sole discretion, defer service of the sentence to confinement. The deferment shall terminate when the sentence is ordered executed. The deferment may be rescinded at any time by the officer who granted it or, if the accused is no longer under his or her jurisdiction, by the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned.

[ 1989 c 48 s 52; 1963 c 220 s 59.]